Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 8 Employment and Training of Peace Officers
35-8-8.
Requirements for appointment or certification of persons as peace officers and preemployment attendance at basic training course; “employment related information” defined.

Any person employed or certified as a peace officer shall:

Be at least 18 years of age;

Be a citizen of the United States;

Have a high school diploma or its recognized equivalent;

Not have been convicted by any state or by the federal government of any crime the punishment for which could have been imprisonment in the federal or state prison or institution nor have been convicted of sufficient misdemeanors to establish a pattern of disregard for the law, provided that, for the purposes of this paragraph, violations of traffic laws and other offenses involving the operation of motor vehicles when the applicant has received a pardon shall not be considered;

Be fingerprinted for the purpose of conducting a fingerprint based search at the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to determine the existence of any criminal record;

Possess good moral character as determined by investigation under procedure established by the council and fully cooperate during the course of such investigation;

Be found, after examination by a licensed physician or surgeon, to be free from any physical, emotional, or mental conditions which might adversely affect his or her exercise of the powers or duties of a peace officer; and

Successfully complete a job related academy entrance examination provided for and administered by the council in conformity with state and federal law. Such examination shall be administered prior to entrance to the basic course provided for in Code Sections 35-8-9 and 35-8-11. The council may change or modify such examination and shall establish the criteria for determining satisfactory performance on such examination. The provisions of this paragraph establish only the minimum requirements of academy entrance examinations for peace officer candidates in this state; each law enforcement unit is encouraged to provide such additional requirements and any preemployment examination as it deems necessary and appropriate. Any person with a degree from a postsecondary institution accredited by a regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this paragraph.

Any person authorized to attend the basic training course prior to employment as a peace officer shall meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “employment related information” means written information contained in a prior employer’s records or personnel files that relates to an applicant’s, candidate’s, or peace officer’s performance or behavior while employed by such prior employer, including performance evaluations, records of disciplinary actions, and eligibility for rehire. Such term shall not include information prohibited from disclosure by federal law or any document not in the possession of the employer at the time a request for such information is received.

Where an investigation is conducted for the purpose of hiring, certifying, or continuing the certification of a peace officer, an employer shall disclose employment related information to the investigating law enforcement agency upon receiving a written request from such agency. Disclosure shall only be required under this subsection if the law enforcement agency’s request is accompanied by a copy of a signed, notarized statement from the applicant, candidate, or peace officer releasing and holding harmless such employer from any and all liability for disclosing complete and accurate information to the law enforcement agency.

An employer may charge a reasonable fee to cover actual costs incurred in copying and furnishing documents to a requesting law enforcement agency, including retrieving and redacting costs, provided such amount shall not exceed $25.00 or 25¢ per page, whichever is greater. No employer shall be required to prepare or create any document not already in the employer’s possession at the time a request for employment related information is received. Any employment related information provided pursuant to this subsection that is not subject to public disclosure while in the possession of a prior employer shall continue to be privileged and protected from public disclosure as a record of the requesting law enforcement agency.

No employer or law enforcement agency shall be subject to any civil liability for any cause of action by virtue of disclosing complete and accurate information to a law enforcement agency in good faith and without malice pursuant to this subsection. In any such cause of action, malice or bad faith shall only be demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed so as to affect or limit rights or remedies provided by federal law.

Before taking final action on an application for employment based, in whole or in part, on any unfavorable employment related information received from a previous employer, a law enforcement agency shall inform the applicant, candidate, or peace officer that it has received such employment related information and that the applicant, candidate, or peace officer may inspect and respond in writing to such information. Upon the applicant’s, candidate’s, or peace officer’s request, the law enforcement agency shall allow him or her to inspect the employment related information and to submit a written response to such information. The request for inspection shall be made within five business days from the date that the applicant, candidate, or peace officer is notified of the law enforcement agency’s receipt of such employment related information. The inspection shall occur not later than ten business days after said notification. Any response to the employment related information shall be made by the applicant, candidate, or peace officer not later than three business days after his or her inspection.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed so as to require any person to provide self-incriminating information or otherwise to compel any person to act in violation of his or her right guaranteed by the Fifth Amendment of the United States Constitution and Article I, Section I, Paragraph XVI of the Georgia Constitution. It shall not be a violation of this Code section for a person to fail to provide requested information based on a claim that such information is self-incriminating provided that notice of such claim is served in lieu of the requested information. An action against such person to require disclosure on the grounds that the claim of self-incrimination is not substantiated may be brought in the superior court of the county of such party’s residence or where such information is located.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 8; Ga. L. 1973, p. 539, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1563, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1684, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1977, p. 712, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1180, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 2004, p. 986, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 237, § 2/SB 373; Ga. L. 2011, p. 545, § 1/SB 95; Ga. L. 2013, p. 864, § 2/HB 366; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 35/HB 323; Ga. L. 2018, p. 336, § 3/HB 867.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language in paragraph (c)(3).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in paragraph (a)(8), deleted the former fourth sentence, which read: “Peace officers who do not perform satisfactorily on the examination shall be ineligible to retake such examination for a period of 30 days after an unsuccessful attempt.”, and added the last sentence.

Cross references.

Qualifications of firefighters, §

25-4-8

.

35-8-9.
Completion of basic training course required; acceptance of other instruction; effect of failure to complete basic training requirements; limitation.

In addition to complying with the preemployment standards as set forth in Code Section 35-8-8, each and every candidate shall satisfactorily complete a basic training course prior to his or her appointment as a peace officer.

The council shall have the authority to recognize instruction received by a candidate if, in the determination of the council, such instruction is at least equivalent to that required by this chapter. If such instruction is recognized, then it shall be in lieu of part or parts of the minimum hours of instruction required for certification by this chapter.

Should any candidate fail to complete successfully the basic training requirements specified in this Code section, he or she shall not perform any of the duties of a peace officer involving the power of arrest until such training shall have been successfully completed.

A municipal correctional institution covered under the provisions of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (7) and subparagraph (C) of paragraph (8) of Code Section 35-8-2 shall not be permitted to have more than ten correctional officers in any 12 month period take the basic training course necessary to become a certified peace officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 9; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1165, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1004, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1355, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1488, § 4A.

35-8-10.
Applicability and effect of certification requirements generally; requirements as to exempt persons.

No person required to comply with the certification provisions of this chapter shall be employed or appointed by any law enforcement unit without certification from the council that the applicant has met the preemployment requirements established in this chapter, and no candidate shall perform any of the duties of a peace officer involving the power of arrest until such training shall have been successfully completed.

Peace officers commencing any employment or service on any terms with the Department of Public Safety, counties, municipalities, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Revenue, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax Unit, the Secretary of State’s investigative section, the Office of the Commissioner of Insurance and Safety Fire Commissioner, or a railroad after July 1, 1975, are required to comply with the certification provisions of this chapter. Peace officers commencing such employment or service prior to July 1, 1975, and whose employment continues on July 1, 1975, are exempt and excused from compliance with the certification provisions of this chapter except as provided in this Code section so long as the registration provided for in subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section remains in effect. Any peace officer otherwise exempt from the certification provisions of this chapter must meet the qualifications and requirements specified in paragraphs (2), (4), (5), and (8) of subsection (a) of Code Section 35-8-8.

If, after July 1, 1975, any other employment or service is conditioned on compliance with this chapter, persons so employed or serving shall be required to comply with the certification provisions established in this chapter, except that persons so employed or serving whose employment or service commenced prior to and continues upon the effective date of the peace officer’s law enforcement unit becoming subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be exempt and excused from compliance so long as registration provided for in subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section remains in effect. Notwithstanding this subsection, the effective date of requirements for certification or registration shall be determined by the council based upon identification of the applicability of this chapter to particular peace officers. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to grant an exemption to persons required to be certified by subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section.

Peace officers exempt from the certification provisions of this chapter are required to register with the council. The registration shall remain in effect for the period of time said person is employed as a peace officer.

Any registration granted in this Code section shall not terminate upon a subsequent employment or appointment as a peace officer, provided that subsequent employment or appointment as a peace officer is recognized by the council to be substantially the same or similar to the employment or appointment by virtue of which said peace officer was exempted and registered as such; provided, further, that such subsequent employment or appointment is commenced within 12 months of such prior termination as a peace officer.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of this Code section, nothing in this subsection or in subsection (d) shall be deemed to require any exempt peace officer to comply with Code Sections 35-8-8 and 35-8-9 for the period of time the registration shall remain in effect.

A peace officer excused from mandatory compliance with this chapter by this Code section may choose to be certified under this chapter. If so, the council shall have the authority to recognize instruction received by such a peace officer as equivalent to all or part of the instruction required for certification under this chapter.

Any person who was serving as a sheriff on July 1, 1970, and who subsequently becomes a peace officer shall not be required to comply with this chapter.

A retired peace officer may be voluntarily registered by the council as an exempt peace officer without meeting the qualifications and requirements specified in paragraphs (2), (4), (5), and (8) of subsection (a) of Code Section 35-8-8. Such registration of a retired peace officer shall not terminate, as provided for in subsection (e) of this Code section. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to grant an exemption to persons required to be certified or registered by this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 13; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1165, § 9; Ga. L. 1976, p. 395, § 8; Ga. L. 1977, p. 713, §§ 3-7; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1680, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2299, §§ 2-6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 778, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1355, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 331, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 724, § 3, effective April 9, 1993, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Any person elected to the office of sheriff at the 1992 general election, which person is a registered peace officer as provided in Code Section 35-8-10, shall be exempt from any qualifications provided for sheriffs in an Act approved April 17, 1992 (Ga. L. 1992, p. 2112), which qualifications are in conflict with the provisions of this Act.”

Paragraph (a)(8) of Code Section 35-8-8, referred to in this Code section, was redesignated as paragraph (a)(7) by Ga. L. 2008, p. 237, § 2/SB 373.

35-8-11.
Basic course to be completed at schools certified by council.

The basic course provided for in Code Section 35-8-9 shall be completed at any school certified by the council which provides the course requirements and methods of instruction established by the council.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 10; Ga. L. 1975, p. 567, § 5; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1165, § 7.

35-8-12.
Certification to use speed detection devices; withdrawal or suspension of certificate.

Persons employed or appointed by any agency, organ, or department of this state or a subdivision or municipality thereof authorized to use speed detection devices shall be required to be certified by the council as qualified speed detection device operators. Each person operating radar speed or laser detection devices shall satisfactorily complete a course of instruction in the theory and application of speed detection device operation as a condition for certification. The council shall establish and modify the curriculum for the course of instruction, including a minimum number of hours. Persons authorized and qualified to conduct the course of instruction required by this Code section shall be certified by the council as speed detection device operator instructors upon complying with requirements prescribed by the council. The council shall have the authority to recognize instruction received by persons subject to the requirements of this Code section if, in the determination of the council, the instruction is at least equivalent to that required by this chapter. If the instruction is recognized, then it shall be accepted in lieu of part or parts of the minimum hours of instruction required for speed detection device certification by this chapter. Should any person fail to complete successfully the training requirements for operation of speed detection devices, he or she shall not perform any functions related to the use of the devices until such training shall have been successfully completed and until such time as the council shall issue appropriate certification. All persons certified to use speed detection devices shall complete an update or refresher training course of such duration and at such time as may be prescribed by the council in order for their speed detection device operators’ certifications to remain in force and effect. The council is authorized to withdraw or suspend the certification of any person for failure to meet the update or refresher requirements specified in this Code section or for violation of any portion of this chapter relating to conditions which may lead to the withdrawal or suspension of peace officer certification to operate radar or laser speed detection devices.

Upon the withdrawal or suspension of any certificate to operate speed detection devices for the reasons set forth in this Code section, the executive director of the council shall notify the commissioner. The notification shall contain the officer’s name and employing law enforcement agency.

Upon receipt from the commissioner that a speed detection device permit has been suspended or revoked pursuant to Code Section 40-14-11, the council shall withdraw or suspend the certification to operate speed detection devices for every certified operator employed by the agency whose permit has been suspended or revoked. The period of withdrawal or suspension shall be consistent with the action taken by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 979, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1281, § 2.

Cross references.

Approval by counties and municipalities of use of speed detection devices within their jurisdiction, and regulation of use of speed detection devices, T. 40, C. 14.

Law reviews.

For review of 1996 use of radar speed detection devices legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 244 (1996).

35-8-13.
[Reserved] Training and certification of police chaplains.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1127, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 35; repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 336, § 4/HB 867, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 336, § 4/HB 867 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2018.

35-8-13.1.
Training and certification of municipal probation officers.

Any person employed or appointed as a municipal probation officer on or after July 1, 2017, shall not be authorized to exercise the power of arrest as a municipal probation officer unless such person has successfully completed a training course and received certification for municipal probation officers approved by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council; provided, however, that such person shall only exercise the power of arrest upon individuals whom he or she is supervising under Article 6 of Chapter 8 of Title 42, unless such person is certified as a peace officer by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council.

Persons applying for certification and persons certified by the council under this Code section shall be subject to the powers and authority of the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council applicable to peace officers as defined in this chapter and shall be required to fulfill all of the requirements of a peace officer, except peace officer training requirements applicable to peace officers only. Such persons shall be required to register with the council. Such registration shall remain in effect for the period of time such person is employed as a municipal probation officer.

Any person who registers with the council pursuant to this Code section shall not have such registration invalidated upon termination of employment or appointment as a municipal probation officer if subsequent employment or appointment as a municipal probation officer is commenced within 12 months of such prior termination of employment or appointment as a municipal probation officer.

Any municipal probation officer exempted from mandatory compliance with this Code section may choose to be certified under this Code section. If so, the council shall have the authority to recognize instruction received by such municipal probation officer as equivalent to all or part of the instruction required for certification under this Code section.

The term “municipal probation officer” as used in this Code section means only municipal probation officers employed directly by a municipality or consolidated government and shall not include employees of private probation providers which contract with municipalities or consolidated governments in accordance with the provisions of Article 6 of Chapter 8 of Title 42; provided, however, that the term “municipal probation officer” shall not include probation officers of any municipal corporation which conducts a training course for such officers if such training course is approved by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council.

Any person who has completed the peace officer basic training course and is certified as a peace officer by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council may serve as a municipal probation officer without obtaining the municipal probation officer training and certification required by this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-13.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 192, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 673, § 2-1/SB 149.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (a), near the beginning, substituted “July 1, 2017,” for “January 1, 1999”, substituted “exercise the power of arrest” for “serve”, and added the proviso at the end.

Cross references.

Prohibition, T. 42, C. 8.

35-8-14.
[Reserved] Board of Corrections and State Board of Pardons and Paroles to establish training program for employees authorized to make arrests.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2478, § 9, effective November 1, 1982.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1978, p. 992, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; and Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 35/HB 79, effective April 24, 2013, reserved the designation of this Code section.

35-8-15.
Preparation and maintenance of employment records by law enforcement units and council; release of records.

Each law enforcement unit shall prepare duplicate records on any candidate or peace officer employed under this chapter as may be prescribed by the rules and regulations of the council. One copy of the records shall be maintained in the headquarters of the law enforcement unit; the second copy shall be forwarded to the council and shall be maintained by the council.

The contents of the records provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, except for court proceedings, shall be considered as confidential and shall be released only to the candidate or peace officer to whom they pertain or to a law enforcement unit considering the candidate or peace officer for employment.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 12; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1165, § 1.

35-8-16.
Effect of standards and training requirements provided in chapter; adoption of additional requirements by law enforcement units.

This chapter establishes only the minimum qualification standards and training requirements for peace officers in this state; each law enforcement unit is encouraged to prescribe such additional requirements as it deems necessary and appropriate.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 11.

35-8-17.
Effect of peace officer’s failure to comply with chapter generally; civil actions against noncomplying peace officers and law enforcement units.

Any peace officer so employed who does not comply with this chapter shall not be authorized to exercise the powers of a law enforcement officer generally and particularly shall not be authorized to exercise the power of arrest.

The council is authorized to bring a civil action against any peace officer who does not comply with this chapter to enjoin the peace officer from performing any and all functions of a peace officer, including the power of arrest, until the officer shall meet the certification or registration requirements of this chapter.

The council is authorized to bring a civil action against any law enforcement unit which employs or appoints any peace officer who fails to meet the certification or registration requirements of this chapter to enjoin the law enforcement unit from allowing the peace officer to perform any and all peace officer functions, including exercising the power of arrest, until such time as the peace officer shall comply with the certification or registration requirements of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 15; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1165, § 11; Ga. L. 1977, p. 713, § 8; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1180, § 3.

35-8-18.
Applicability of chapter to emergency peace officers.

This chapter shall not apply to emergency peace officers.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 14; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1165, § 10.

35-8-19.
Appointment of citizen of adjoining state as peace officer.

In each city of this state adjacent to the State of Georgia boundary line, the sheriff, mayor, or other person authorized to appoint peace officers may appoint as special deputy, special constable, marshal, policeman, or other peace officer a person who is not a citizen of Georgia but who is a citizen of an adjoining state, provided such appointed person is otherwise qualified to serve as a peace officer.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 29; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1325, § 1.

35-8-20.
Training requirements for police chiefs, department heads, and wardens; effect of failure to fulfill training requirement; waiver of requirements.

During calendar year 1985 and during each calendar year thereafter, the chief of police or department head of each law enforcement unit and wardens of state institutions shall complete 20 hours of training as provided in this Code section.

The training required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be completed in sessions as selected and provided or approved by the Georgia Association of Chiefs of Police or the Georgia Prison Wardens Association and which have been recognized by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council.

The salary and travel expenses of a chief of police or department head of a law enforcement unit or a warden of a state institution taking the required training shall be paid by the law enforcement unit by which he or she is employed.

Any chief of police or department head of a law enforcement unit or a warden of a state institution who does not fulfill the training requirement of this Code section shall lose his or her power of arrest.

A waiver of the requirement of training provided in this Code section may be granted by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, in its discretion, upon the presentation of evidence by a chief of police or department head of a law enforcement unit or a warden of a state institution that he or she was unable to complete such training due to medical disability, providential cause, or other reason deemed sufficient by the council.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1210, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 35; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35; Ga. L. 1997, p. 542, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1488, § 5.

35-8-20.1.
Training for police chiefs and department heads appointed after June 30, 1999; waivers.

Any newly appointed chief of police or department head of a law enforcement unit whose term of employment commences after June 30, 1999, shall successfully complete a minimum of 60 hours of law enforcement chief executive training at the next scheduled law enforcement chief executive training class sponsored by the Georgia Association of Chiefs of Police following his or her appointment. Such training shall be in addition to the basic training required of peace officers in Code Section 35-8-9. A sworn employee acting in the capacity of a department head of a law enforcement unit for more than 60 days shall be required to attend training specified under this Code section and Code Section 35-8-20. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any sheriff or to any head of any law enforcement unit within the office of sheriff.

The training required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be completed in sessions as selected and provided by the Georgia Association of Chiefs of Police which have been recognized by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council.

Reserved.

The salary and travel expenses of a chief of police or department head of a law enforcement unit taking the required training shall be paid by the law enforcement unit by which he is employed.

Any newly appointed chief of police or department head of a law enforcement unit who does not fulfill the training requirement of this Code section shall lose his power of arrest.

Any newly appointed chief of police or department head of a law enforcement unit who satisfactorily completes the training required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be exempted for the year in which he completes such training from the training required by subsection (a) of Code Section 35-8-20.

A chief of police or head of a law enforcement department who successfully completes the training required by subsection (a) of this Code section will not be required to repeat such training if he terminates an appointment and is subsequently reappointed to the same or another department.

A waiver of the requirement of training provided in this Code section may be granted by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, in its discretion, upon the presentation of evidence by a newly appointed chief of police or department head of a law enforcement unit that he or she has served as an appointed chief of police or head of a law enforcement unit since December 31, 1992, without more than a 60 day break in service, that he or she has satisfactorily completed training or education deemed by the council to be equivalent to the training required by this Code section, or that he or she was unable to complete such training due to medical disability, providential cause, or other reason deemed sufficient by the council.

Any chief of police or department head of a law enforcement unit who is exempted from the training required by subsection (a) of this Code section may choose to attend such training in lieu of the training required by Code Section 35-8-20 for any year.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-20.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1637, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1780, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 542, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1488, § 6; Ga. L. 1999, p. 777, § 4.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council” was substituted for “Peace Officer Standards and Training Council” in subsection (h).

35-8-21.
Training requirements for peace officers; waiver; exemption for retired peace officers; confirmation of training.

During calendar year 1999 and during each calendar year thereafter, any person employed or appointed as a peace officer shall complete 20 hours of training as provided in this Code section; provided, however, that any peace officer serving with the Department of Public Safety who is a commissioned officer shall receive annual training as specified by the commissioner of public safety.

The training required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be completed in sessions approved or recognized by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council.

Peace officers who satisfactorily complete the basic course of training in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be excused from the minimum annual training requirement for the calendar year during which the basic course is completed.

Any peace officer who does not fulfill the training requirements of this Code section shall lose his or her power of arrest.

A waiver of the requirement of training provided in this Code section may be granted by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, in its discretion, upon the presentation of evidence by a peace officer that he or she was unable to complete such training due to medical disability, providential cause, or other reason deemed sufficient by the council.

Any person who is registered or certified with the council as a retired peace officer is excused and exempt from compliance with this Code section for the year in which he or she retires. A retired peace officer may voluntarily comply with the requirements of this Code section and, in that event, such retired peace officer shall receive such minimal annual training without payment of any fees or costs, but only if sufficient class space is available. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to grant an exemption to persons required to complete the annual training requirement of this Code section.

Any person required to comply with this Code section shall provide confirmation of his or her training for the previous year to the council in a manner required by the council. Failure to provide the council with confirmation of training in a timely manner or failure to obtain required training in a timely manner shall result in an emergency suspension of the officer’s certification by the executive director. The order of emergency suspension issued by the executive director shall be made in writing and shall specify the basis for the determination. The emergency suspension order shall continue in effect until the training requirements are confirmed or a waiver is issued pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section. An emergency suspension issued pursuant to this subsection shall be automatically withdrawn upon confirmation of required training or the issuance of a waiver by the council.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1063, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 777, § 5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 986, § 2A; Ga. L. 2013, p. 864, § 3/HB 366.

35-8-21.1.
Use of retired peace and correctional officers in emergency or disaster; training; immunities; compensation; power of arrest.

Any law enforcement unit in this state may supplement its workforce as necessary with qualified, retired peace officers or correctional officers when a disaster or emergency has been declared by a county sheriff, a public safety director, or the Governor or when there is a national emergency.

Retired peace officers and retired correctional officers assisting law enforcement units under the provisions of this Code section shall be in compliance with the annual training and qualification standards for peace officers established under this chapter.

Any retired peace officer or retired correctional officer assisting the requesting entity shall have the same immunities and powers of arrest as he or she has in his or her own jurisdiction, and the same powers of arrest as officers of the requesting entity, including sovereign immunity, official immunity, and the public duty doctrine, for the duration of the declared disaster or emergency. Such powers shall be limited to the location where the retired officer’s services are requested to be provided, for the duration of the specific event, and while acting under the direction of the requesting entity’s chief law enforcement officer or his or her designee.

Any retired peace officer or correctional officer assisting a requesting entity shall be deemed an employee of the requesting entity for the duration of the declared disaster or emergency and shall be subject to the workers’ compensation, overtime, and expense reimbursement provisions provided to him or her as an employee of the requesting entity.

Any compensation awarded to retirees for service under this Code section shall be paid by the requesting entity.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to limit the powers of arrest provided to a law enforcement officer by any other law.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-21.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 481, § 2/SB 341.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

35-8-22.
Reimbursement of training expenses by subsequent employer of peace officer; collection procedure; required documentation.

Unless otherwise provided by an employment contract to the contrary, if the State of Georgia or any county or municipality thereof employs a peace officer and said peace officer is hired by another agency within 15 months after completing mandated or formalized training requirements, then the total expense of training, including salary paid during training, shall be reimbursed by the hiring agency to the State of Georgia or any county or municipality thereof which initially paid for such training. If said officer is hired by another agency during a period of 15 to 24 months after mandated or formalized training requirements are completed, then one-half of the total expense of training, including salary paid during training, shall be reimbursed by the hiring agency to the State of Georgia or any county or municipality thereof which initially paid for such training. The council shall set standards for reimbursement by hiring agencies based upon actual expenses incurred in mandated or formalized training by individual departments.

The State of Georgia or any county or municipality thereof which initially paid for the training of a peace officer shall submit an itemized, sworn statement to the new employer of the peace officer and shall demand payment thereof and may enforce collection of such obligation through civil remedies and procedures.

Effective July 1, 2003, in order for the State of Georgia or any county or municipality thereof to demand reimbursement, the demanding governmental unit must be able to document that the peace officer in question signed an acknowledgment of the terms of this Code section or an employment contract specifying the provisions of this Code section prior to such peace officer’s employment with the demanding governmental unit. Otherwise, this Code section shall not apply to such demand for reimbursement.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1325, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 327, § 1.